Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-369.05
Notice or order; service.

Any notice or order provided for in sections 75-369.01 to 75-369.07 shall be personally served on the respondent or on the person authorized by the respondent to receive notices and orders or shall be sent by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last-known address of the respondent or the person authorized to receive such notices and orders. A copy of the notice or order shall be filed in the records of the carrier enforcement division of the Nebraska State Patrol.

Laws 1994, LB 358, § 5.